West Virginia, session 2026, HB4900.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-55.  Free feminine hygiene products for female students. County boards of education in this state shall provide female students free access to feminine hygiene products in all public elementary, middle, and high schools to be paid for using existing appropriations for hygiene products.